it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Arbitraggio e allenamento > Strumenti segnacampo per sport: Coni di confine; Gesso per tracciatura campi; Macchine traccialinee per campi; Vernice per segnaletica sul campo; Stencil per tracciatura campi; Nastro per segnaletica sul campo; Nastri per linee di campo
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Coaching & Officiating > Field & Court Boundary Markers: Boundary Cones; Field Marking Chalk; Field Marking Machines; Field Marking Paint; Field Marking Stencils; Field Marking Tape; Field Marking Webbing
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 教练与裁判用品 > 场地/球场边界标记: 边界锥桶; 场地划线粉; 场地划线机; 场地标线漆; 场地划线模板; 场地标线带; 场地划线织带
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Dommerudstyr > Banemarkører: Grænsekegler; Kridt til baneopmærkning; Maskiner til baneopmærkning; Banemarkeringsmaling; Stencils til baneopmærkning; Banemarkeringsbånd; Markeringsbånd til baner
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Treinamento e arbitragem > Marcadores de limite para campos e quadras: Cones de limite; Giz de marcação de campo; Máquinas de marcação de campo; Pintura de marcação de campo; Moldes de marcação de campo; Fita de marcação de campo; Fitas de marcação de campo
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Domarutrustning > Gränsmarkörer för sport- och idrottsplaner: Gränskoner; Kritor för fältmarkering; Maskiner för fältmarkering; Fältmarkeringsfärg; Schabloner för fältmarkering; Fältmarkeringstejp; Linjeband för fältmarkering
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Προπονητική & διαιτησία > Σημάνσεις ορίων γηπέδων: Κώνοι ορίων; Κιμωλία διαγράμμισης γηπέδου; Μηχανήματα διαγράμμισης γηπέδου; Χρώμα σήμανσης γηπέδων; Στένσιλ διαγράμμισης γηπέδου; Ταινία σήμανσης γηπέδων; Ταινίες διαγράμμισης γηπέδου
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > 指導者・審判向け用品 > フィールド・コート用境界マーカー: 境界コーン; フィールドマーキングチョーク; ラインカー・マーキングマシン; フィールドマーキングペイント; フィールドマーキングステンシル; フィールドマーキングテープ; コートラインテープ・ウェビング
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Треньорство и съдийство > Означения за граници на полето и корта: Конуси за означаване на граница; Маркировъчна креда за спортни терени; Машини за маркироване на спортни терени; Боя за маркиране на полета; Шаблони за маркиране на полета; Тиксо за маркиране на полета; Маркировъчна лента за спортни терени
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Akcesoria sędziowskie > Materiały i narzędzia do oznaczania granic boisk i kortów: Stożki graniczne; Kreda do wyznaczania boisk; Wózki do malowania linii; Farba do znakowania w terenie; Szablony do wyznaczania boisk; Taśma do znakowania w terenie; Taśmy do wyznaczania boisk
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Treniranje i suđenje > Oznake za granice terena i igrališta: Tuljci; Kreda za označavanje terena; Sprave za označavanje terena; Boja za označavanje terena; Šablone za označavanje polja; Trake za označavanje terena; Mreža za označavanje terena
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Dømming > Banemarkører: Grensekjegler; Banekritt; Banemerkingsmaskiner; Feltmarkeringsmaling; Sjablonger for banemerking; Feltmarkeringstape; Banemerkingsbånd
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Coachen en scheidsrechteren > Veld- en baanmarkeringen: Markeerkegels; Kalk voor veldmarkering; Veldmarkeringsmachines; Veldmarkeringsverf; Sjablonen voor veldmarkering; Veldmarkeringstape; Markeringsbanden voor velden
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Huấn luyện thể dục thể thao > Dụng cụ đánh dấu đường biên sân thể thao: Cọc đường biên; Phấn kẻ vạch sân; Máy kẻ vạch sân; Sơn đánh dấu sân thể thao; Khuôn kẻ vạch sân; Băng đánh dấu sân thể thao; Dây kẻ vạch sân
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Товары для тренеров и судей > Товары для разметки полей и площадок: Фишки и конусы для разметки; Мел для разметки поля; Машинки для разметки поля; Краска для разметки; Трафареты для разметки поля; Лента для разметки; Ленты для разметки поля
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 코치/심판 용품 > 운동장/코트 경계 마커: 경계 표시 콘; 필드 마킹 초크; 필드 마킹 머신; 필드 표시 페인트; 필드 마킹 스텐실; 필드 표시 테이프; 필드 마킹 웨빙
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Treniravimas ir sporto administravimas > Aikštelių ir kortų ribų žymekliai: Ribų ženklinimo kūgiai; Aikštelių ženklinimo kreida; Aikščių ženklinimo mašinos; Aikštelių ženklinimo dažai; Aikštės ženklinimo trafaretai; Aikštelių ženklinimo juosta; Aikščių ženklinimo juostos
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Valmennus ja tuomarointi > Kentän rajamerkintä: Rajakartiot; Kentänmerkintäliitu; Kentänmerkintälaitteet; Kenttämerkintämaali; Kentänmerkintäsapluunat; Kenttämerkintäteippi; Kentänmerkintänauhat
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Trainer- & Schiedsrichterausrüstung > Begrenzungsmarkierungen für Spielfelder: Grenzkegel; Feldmarkierungskreide; Feldmarkierungsmaschinen; Feldmarkierungsfarbe; Feldmarkierungsschablonen; Feldmarkierungsband; Feldmarkierungsbänder
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Trenerstvo in sodništvo > Mejne oznake polja in igrišča: Mejni stožci; Kreda za označevanje igrišča; Stroji za označevanje igrišča; Barva za označevanje igrišča; Šablone za označevanje igrišča; Trak za označevanje igrišča; Trakovi za označevanje igrišča
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Potřeby pro trenéry a rozhodčí > Značení hranic hřiště: Vymezovací kužely; Křídy na lajnování hřiště; Lajnovací vozíky na hřiště; Značící barva; Šablony na lajnování hřiště; Značící páska; Lajnovací pásky na hřiště
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Antrenamente și prezentare > Elemente de delimitare pentru teren: Conuri delimitare; Cretă pentru marcarea terenului; Mașini pentru marcarea terenului; Vopsea pentru marcat terenul; Șabloane pentru marcarea terenului; Bandă pentru marcat terenul; Bandă pentru marcarea terenului
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Accesorios para árbitros > Marcadores de límites para pistas y campos: Conos límite; Tiza para marcar campos; Máquinas para marcar campos; Pintura para marcar el campo; Plantillas para marcar campos; Cinta de marcado de campo; Cintas para marcar campos
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Koçluk ve Hakemlik > Saha ve Kort Sınırı Çizme Araçları: Sınır Konileri; Saha işaretleme kireci; Saha işaretleme makineleri; Alan İşaretleme Boyası; Saha işaretleme şablonları; Alan İşaretleme Bandı; Saha işaretleme şeritleri
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Edzés és játékvezetés > Mező- és udvari határjelzők: Határkúpok; Pályajelölő kréta; Pályajelölő gépek; Mezőjelölő festék; Pályajelölő sablonok; Mezőjelölő szalag; Pályajelölő szalagok
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > การโค้ชและการกำกับ > เครื่องทำขอบเขตสำหรับสนามและคอร์ด: กรวยแบ่งขอบเขต; ชอล์กตีเส้นสนาม; เครื่องตีเส้นสนาม; สีทาเครื่องหมายสนาม; แผ่นสเตนซิลตีเส้นสนาม; เทปตีเส้นสนาม; เทปตีเส้นสนาม
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Accessoires d'entraînement et d'arbitrage > Marquage des lignes de terrains et courts: Cônes de délimitation; Craie de marquage de terrain; Machines de marquage de terrain; Peinture de marquage de terrain; Pochoirs de marquage de terrain; Ruban de marquage de terrain; Sangles de marquage de terrain
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 教練和裁判用具 > 球場界線標記工具: 邊界錐; 場地劃線粉; 場地劃線機; 球場標記漆; 場地劃線模板; 球場標記膠帶; 場地標示織帶
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Koučovanie a organizácia športového podujatia > Vymedzovacie značky ihriska a kurtu: Vymedzovacie kužele; Krieda na vymedzenie poľa; Stroje na vymedzenie poľa; Farba na vymedzenie poľa; Šablóny na značenie ihriska; Páska na vymedzenie poľa; Pásy na vymedzenie poľa
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Itens para treinadores e árbitros > Delimitadores de campo: Cones delimitadores; Giz de marcação de campo; Máquinas de marcação de campo; Tinta para marcação de campo; Moldes de marcação de campo; Fita para marcação de campo; Fitas de marcação de campo